Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-358
Exploitation, defined.

Exploitation means the wrongful or unauthorized taking, withholding, appropriation, conversion, control, or use of money, funds, securities, assets, or any other property of a vulnerable adult or senior adult by any person by means of undue influence, breach of a fiduciary relationship, deception, extortion, intimidation, force or threat of force, isolation, or any unlawful means or by the breach of a fiduciary duty by the guardian, conservator, agent under a power of attorney, trustee, or any other fiduciary of a vulnerable adult or senior adult.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 11;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB934, § 4.

The statutory definition of exploitation does not require proof of a financial crime. State v. Vanderford, 312 Neb. 580, 980 N.W.2d 397 (2022).